Tennessee statutes. Title 21 Proceedings In Chancery
Part 8

Decrees and Execution

21-1-801. Sequestration.

If the court see proper in the first instance, or if upon issuance of the attachment, the delinquent cannot be found, a writ of sequestration may issue against the estate of the delinquent, to compel obedience to the decree.

Code 1858, § 4487; Shan., § 6304; Code 1932, § 10597; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-1206.

Cross-References. Seizure of person or property, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 64.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 300, 301, 311.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Collateral References. 70 Am. Jur. 2d Sequestration §§ 1-36.

30 C.J.S. Equity § 617.

Contempt cases, seizure or impounding of property in. 167 A.L.R. 713.

Contingent or defeasible future interest, right of owner of, to remedy by sequestration. 144 A.L.R. 796.

Jurisdiction of equity to sequester, or otherwise provisionally secure, assets for application upon money demand which has not been reduced to judgment. 116 A.L.R. 270.

Sequestration bond, liability of sureties on, for payment of judgment rendered against their principal, for so much thereof as includes damages for acts fraudulently or wrongfully committed prior to execution of bond. 100 A.L.R. 382.

Sureties on sequestration bonds as affected by judgment by consent, confession or default of principal. 51 A.L.R. 1493.

Sequestration
13.

21-1-802. Mesne and final process — Common law writs.

Courts of chancery are further authorized to issue such process, mesne and final, as has been used in the chancery courts; and all writs for the collection of money, or to obtain the possession of real or personal property, in use in the common law courts, may be adapted to the execution of decrees in the courts of chancery.

Code 1858, § 4488 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 22, § 2); Shan., § 6305; Code 1932, § 10598; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-1207.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 301.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

21-1-803. Foreclosure sale.

Where, upon the foreclosure of a mortgage or deed of trust, or in any case, the specified land to be sold is mentioned in the decree, the court, upon the application of the complainant, may order that:

The property be sold on a credit of not less than six (6) months nor more than two (2) years;

When the sale is made, reported and confirmed, no right of redemption or repurchase shall exist in the debtor or the debtor's creditors, but that the purchaser's title shall be absolute; and

The surplus of the purchase money, or the bonds or notes taken for the purchase money, over and above what is necessary to pay the complainant's debt, be paid to the debtor or the debtor's other creditors entitled to the payment.

Code 1858, § 4489 (deriv. Acts 1832, ch. 36, § 2; 1833, ch. 47, § 2; 1837-1838, ch. 166, § 2); Shan., § 6306; Code 1932, § 10599; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-1208.

Cross-References. Injunction of sale, title 29, ch. 23, part 2.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 278.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judicial Sales, § 7; 21 Tenn. Juris., Redemption of Real Estate Sold for Debt, § 25.

Law Reviews.

Forms of Relief, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 400.

Tennessee Homeowners' Post Foreclosure Auction Right to Cure Under 11 U.S.C. §§ 1322(b) and (c), 27 U. Mem. L. Rev. 453 (1997).

Cited: Thomas v. Setliffe, 160 Tenn. 689, 28 S.W.2d 344, 1929 Tenn. LEXIS 143 (1930).

21-1-804. Enforcement of orders and decrees.

Courts of chancery may enforce rules, orders or decrees by process against the person in default, or by process against the person in default's property.

Code 1858, § 4478 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 23); Shan., § 6295; Code 1932, § 10588; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-1209.

Cross-References. Enforcement of restraining orders and injunctions, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 65.06.

Execution of judgments by attachment for contempt, § 26-1-102.

Judgment for specific acts, court powers, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 70.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 300, 306.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Equity, § 102.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281.

Cited: Kuykendall v. Wheeler, 890 S.W.2d 785, 1994 Tenn. LEXIS 353 (Tenn. 1994).

21-1-805. Issuance of attachment.

An attachment issues by order of the court upon the officer's return or affidavit of the service of a copy of the decree ten (10) days beforehand, and that the party has failed or refused to comply with the terms of the order.

Code 1858, § 4479 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 22); Shan., § 6296; Code 1932, § 10589; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-1210.

Cross-References. Judgments enforced by attachment, § 26-1-102.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 305.

21-1-806. Attachment without service of decree.

If the defendant in execution keeps out of the way or absconds, so that a copy of the decree cannot be served upon the defendant, or if the defendant evades receiving the decree, an affidavit of that fact, and that a copy of the decree was tendered the defendant, or left at the defendant's last place of abode, shall authorize the issuance of the attachment without actual service of the copy.

Code 1858, § 4480 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 22); Shan., § 6297; Code 1932, § 10590; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-1211.

Cross-References. Seizure of person or property, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 64.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 305.

Collateral References. Equity
438.

21-1-807. Commitment for nonperformance of decree.

In attachments for the nonperformance of decrees, no bail is to be taken, but the party shall be committed to jail, there to remain until the party performs the decree.

Code 1858, § 4481 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 23); Shan., § 6298; Code 1932, § 10591; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-1212.

Cross-References. Seizure of person or property, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 64.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 306, 376, 377, 462.

Law Reviews.

The Contempt Powers of Tennessee Courts (E. Michael Ellis), 37 Tenn. L. Rev. 538.

21-1-808. Habeas corpus on purge of contempt.

The court, or a judge of the court in vacation, may, in such case, grant a habeas corpus, and discharge the party, if the party purges the contempt, upon such conditions in respect to the party's compliance with the decree as the judge thinks proper.

Code 1858, § 4482 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 23); Shan., § 6299; Code 1932, § 10592; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-1213.

Cross-References. Habeas corpus proceedings, title 29, ch. 21.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 377.

Collateral References. 39 C.J.S. Habeas Corpus §§ 113, 193, 196, 205.

Habeas Corpus
22(2).

21-1-809. Hearing on habeas corpus.

The adverse party, the adverse party's agent or attorney is entitled to reasonable notice of the hearing upon the writ of habeas corpus granted pursuant to § 21-1-808, if in the state, and may interrogate the party in contempt upon the party in contempt's oath, and controvert the truth of the party in contempt's statements by other proof.

Code 1858, § 4483 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 6, § 23); Shan., § 6300; Code 1932, § 10593; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-1214.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 306, 377.

Collateral References. 39 C.J.S. Habeas Corpus §§ 113, 193, 196, 205.

21-1-810. Reinstatement of remanded cases.

In all cases remanded by the supreme court or court of appeals to any court for the execution of an order of reference, order of sale or for other proceedings directed in the decree of the appellate court or in the decree of the lower courts as affirmed or modified by the appellate court, the cases shall be deemed reinstated in the lower court from the time of filing with the clerk and master or clerk of the court a certified copy of the decree or mandate of the appellate court; and thereafter such cases may be proceeded in, in accordance with the decree of the appellate court, without any action of the lower court on the case. It shall not be necessary for the decree or mandate of the appellate court to be spread of record, in the lower court, by direction of the lower court, before the clerk and master, clerk of the court, or the parties may proceed in such case in accordance with the decree or mandate of the appellate court.

Acts 1901, ch. 10, § 1; Shan., § 6245a1; mod. Code 1932, § 10531; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-1217.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 316.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 257.

Cited: Wall v. Thalco, Inc., 614 S.W.2d 803, 1981 Tenn. App. LEXIS 489 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1981); Parrish v. Marquis, 137 S.W.3d 621, 2004 Tenn. LEXIS 250 (Tenn. 2004).

21-1-811. Notice of appellate decree.

Upon the receipt of any certified copy of decree, or mandate of any appellate court, the clerk and master or clerk of the lower court, shall file the decree or mandate, copy it upon the rule docket or minute book, if the court so directs, and notify the attorney of record in the case of the filing of the decree or mandate. The clerk and master or clerk of the lower court shall receive the same compensation for these services as now allowed by law for similar services; provided, that it shall not be necessary for the clerk of the lower court to send the notice if a procedure has been established whereby the clerk of the appellate court is required to send notice.

Acts 1901, ch. 10, § 2; Shan., § 6245a2; Code 1932, § 10532; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 21-1218; Acts 1983, ch. 332, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Cited: Wall v. Thalco, Inc., 614 S.W.2d 803, 1981 Tenn. App. LEXIS 489 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1981).